North Carolina, session 2025, HB668.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. GRANT PROGRAM AT NORTH CAROLINA COMMUNITY COLLEGES TO
EXPAND INCOME TAX ASSISTANCE IN THE STATE
SECTION 1.(a) Program Established. – Within the funds appropriated in subsection
(d) of this section, the State Board of Community Colleges shall establish a grant program for
participating community college campuses to offer courses to students to become tax preparers
as part of the Volunteer Income Tax Assistance (VITA) program and to facilitate providing VITA
services to all students on campus, as well as community members. The Internal Revenue Service
(IRS) offers free tax help through VITA to (i) people who generally make sixty-seven thousand
dollars ($67,000) or less, (ii) persons with disabilities, and (iii) limited English-speaking
taxpayers who need assistance in preparing their own tax returns. The goal of the grant program
shall be for community colleges to provide work-based opportunities to students while
facilitating access to the VITA program for their local communities.
SECTION 1.(b) Components of the Program. – In administering the grant program,
the State Board of Community Colleges shall require participating community colleges to do at
least the following:
*H668-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Offer the following courses to students interested in becoming certified as tax
preparers for the VITA program:
a. A fall curriculum course for the purposes of teaching basic tax
accounting and training students on the preparation of federal and
North Carolina tax returns. The course shall lead to the completion of
the IRS Link and Learn training to become certified as tax preparers
for the VITA program.
b. A spring work-based learning course where students commit to 15
hours per week from January through April 15 to prepare taxes.
(2) Designate a faculty champion to facilitate the program.
(3) Provide VITA services to be offered to all students on campus as well as
community members.
SECTION 1.(c) Applications for Grants. – A community college shall apply for a
grant to the State Board with a plan to implement the VITA program on its campus with at least
the following information:
(1) A time line for implementing the curriculum and a recruitment of students to
become certified as VITA tax preparers.
(2) Options for paid work-based opportunities for students as part of the spring
curriculum. Students shall be provided hourly compensation for tax
preparation assistance during tax season as part of the program.
(3) Start-up and ongoing costs for personnel, including site coordinators and
quality reviewers, and budget for continuing costs for running the VITA
program.
SECTION 1.(d) Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Community Colleges System Office the sum of one million three hundred eighty thousand
dollars ($1,380,000) in nonrecurring funds and six hundred ten thousand dollars ($610,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to implement the grant program in accordance with
this act. The funds shall be used as follows with any unexpended funds returned to the System
Office:
(1) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of seven hundred ninety thousand
dollars ($790,000) in nonrecurring funds may be used for creation of the
curriculum, for bonuses of up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500)
per community college receiving a grant to support a faculty champion on
campus, to support hiring personnel for the VITA program, and to establish
work-based learning opportunities for students.
(2) For the 2025-2026 fiscal year and for subsequent fiscal years, six hundred ten
thousand dollars ($610,000) in recurring funds may be used to support hiring
personnel for the VITA program and to establish work-based learning
opportunities for students. The System Office may use up to fifty thousand
dollars ($50,000) of the recurring funds appropriated for the program each
fiscal year for administrative costs associated with administering the grant
program.
SECTION 1.(e) Of the nonrecurring funds appropriated to the Community Colleges
System Office in subsection (d) of this section for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the sum of up to
five hundred ninety thousand dollars ($590,000) shall not revert at the end of the 2025-2026
fiscal year but shall remain available until the end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year to provide bonuses
of up to five hundred dollars ($500.00) per community college receiving a grant to support a
faculty champion on campus, to support hiring personnel for the VITA program, and to establish
work-based learning opportunities for students.
SECTION 1.(f) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Revenue the sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in nonrecurring funds and one hundred
Page 2 House Bill 668-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide training
and technical assistance to community college campus personnel and students participating in
the grant program in accordance with this act. The Department of Revenue may use the funds
appropriated pursuant to this section to contract with a third-party vendor to provide technical
assistance and support for the program.

PART II. FUNDS TO THE UNITED WAY OF NORTH CAROLINA TO EXPAND ITS
VOLUNTEER INCOME TAX ASSISTANCE PROGRAM
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of eight hundred forty thousand dollars ($840,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated as a directed grant to the United
Way of North Carolina to expand its Volunteer Income Tax Assistance (VITA) program. These
funds shall be used to increase the number of VITA locations, provide dedicated staff to support
evaluation of the program and recruitment, provide needed software and office supplies for the
program, and improve marketing and communication efforts to include multilingual materials,
connection to online resources where internet is available, and educational opportunities on
household budgeting, financial planning, and other resources to improve financial skills. These
funds shall not revert at the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year but shall remain available until the
end of the 2026-2027 fiscal year.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 668-First Edition Page 3